src/scripts/Russian/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define ApplyOrthoepicRules 
о г о:О @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
е г:в О @-> || _ .#. ,, 
е г:в о @-> || _ .#. ,, 
е г:в о с я @-> || _ .#. ,, 
о г:в о @-> || \.#. _ .#. ,, 
О г:в о @-> || _ .#. ,, 
о г:в О @-> || _ .#. ,, 
с е г:в О д н я @-> || .#. _ ,, 
({не} | {на}) {мнОго} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
({не} | {за}) {дОрого} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
(н е) {стрОго} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
{нАстрого} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
{полОго} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
{отмЕться} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
((п) о) {забОться} @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
[т (ь) с]:ц я:а @-> || _ .#. ,, 
б О г:х @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
г:х [к|ч] @-> || _ ,, 
с т:0 с к @-> || _ ,, 
{дс}:ц {тв} @-> || _ ,, 
{тс}:ц {тв} @-> || _ ,, 
ч:ш т О @-> || .#. _ ,, 
н и ч:ш т О @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
к о н Е ч:ш н о @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
н а р О ч:ш н о @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
н е н а р О ч:ш н о @-> || .#. _ .#. ,, 
я И ч:ш н и ц @-> || .#. _ ,, 
с к У ч:ш н @-> || _ ,, 
с к у ч:ш н @-> || _ ,, 
д в О е ч:ш н и @-> || .#. _ ,, 
т р О е ч:ш н и @-> || .#. _ ,, 
п о м О щ:ш н и @-> || .#. _ ,, 
ч У в:0 с т в @-> || _ ,, 
ч у в:0 с т в @-> || _ ,, 
з д р А в:0 с т в @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{безмОл} в:0 {ств} @-> || .#. _ ,, 
с т:0 н @-> || _ ,, 
з д:0 н @-> || _ ,, 
л:0 н ц @-> || _ ,, 
{сч}:щ А с т:0 л и в @-> || _ ,, 
{сч}:щ а с т:0 л И в @-> || _ ,, 
ж А л о с т:0 л и в @-> || .#. _ ,, 
з а в И с т:0 л и в @-> || .#. _ ,, 
у ч А с т:0 л и в @-> || .#. _ ,, 
н т:0 щ @-> || _ ,, 
р д:0 ч @-> || _ ,, 
н д:0 ц @-> || _ ,, 
р д:0 ц @-> || _ ,, 
б е с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
и с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
и {сч}:щ Е з @-> || .#. _ ,, 
и {сч}:щ е з @-> || .#. _ ,, 
р а с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
р О с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
ч е р е с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
с @-> || .#. _ ч ,, 
{сч}:щ А с т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{сч}:щ а с т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{сч}:щ ё т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{сч}:щ и т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{сч}:щ И т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
р а {сч}:щ ё т @-> || .#. _ ,, 
{сч}:щ @-> || \.#. _ ,, 
{зч}:щ @-> || _ ,, 
{здч}:щ @-> || _ ,, 
р г:0 с к @-> || _ ,, 
н д:0 с к @-> || _ ,, 
н т:0 с к @-> || _ ,, 
с т:0 ц @-> || _ ,, 
з д:0 ц @-> || _ ,, 
д:0 ц а т @-> || _ ,, 
д:0 ц А т @-> || _ ,, 
м у {жч}:щ И н @-> || .#. _ ,, 
п е р е б Е {жч}:щ и @-> || .#. _ ; 

define SoftConsonant bb | vv | gg | dd | zz | j | kk | ll | mm | nn | pp | rr | ss | tt | ff | hh | ch | sch;
define HardConsonant b | v | g | d | zh | z | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | f | h | c | sh;

define YVowelLetter е | Е | ё | Ё | ю | Ю | я | Я;
define VowelLetter а | А | и | И | о | О | у | У | ы | Ы | э | Э | YVowelLetter;

define TranscribeI и:i0 | И:i1;
define TranscribeYVowel е:e0 | Е:e1 | ё:o1 | Ё:o1 | ю:u0 | Ю:u1 | я:a0 | Я:a1;
define TranscribeHardVowel а:a0 | А:a1 | о:o0 | О:o1 | у:u0 | У:u1 | ы:y0 | Ы:y1 | э:e0 | Э:e1;
define TranscribeVowel TranscribeHardVowel | TranscribeI | TranscribeYVowel;

define TranscribeAsHardConsonant б:b | в:v | г:g | д:d | ж:zh | з:z | й:j | к:k | л:l | м:m | н:n | п:p | р:r | с:s | т:t | ф:f | х:h | ц:c | ч:ch | ш:sh | щ:sch;

define TranscribeAsSoftConsonant б:bb | в:vv | г:gg | д:dd | ж:zh | з:zz | й:j | к:kk | л:ll | м:mm | н:nn | п:pp | р:rr | с:ss | т:tt | ф:ff | х:hh | ц:c | ч:ch | ш:sh | щ:sch;

define Transcribe 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant ь:0 @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant TranscribeYVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant TranscribeI @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsSoftConsonant ь:j TranscribeVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsHardConsonant ъ:j TranscribeVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeAsHardConsonant @-> || _ ,, 
0:j TranscribeYVowel @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeI @-> || _ ,, 
TranscribeHardVowel @-> || _ ,, 
ь @-> 0 || _ ,, 
ъ @-> 0 || _ ; 

define ChangeItoYAfterHardConsonants 
i0 -> y0 , i1 -> y1 || c | zh | sh _ ; 

source stress_in_text.foma

regex 
[[%- | WrittenStressMark] -> 0] .o. 
ApplyOrthoepicRules .o. 
Transcribe .o. 
ChangeItoYAfterHardConsonants ; 
